District of Columbia statutes.
3-1202.20

Boards of Behavioral Health executive director.

The Mayor shall appoint an executive director, who shall be a full-time employee of the District, to implement and administer the orders of the Boards of Behavioral Health in accordance with this chapter and rules and regulations issued pursuant to this chapter.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 220
as added July 18, 2009, D.C. Law 18-26, § 2(c), 56 DCR 4043
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(c) of Health Occupations Revision General Amendment Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-146, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6308).